fr: Design de la tête de rasoir: Double; Unique; Triple; Autre
cs: Design hlavy strojku: Dvojité; Jedna funkce; Trojitý; Jiné
en: Razor head design: Double; Single; Triple; Other
es: Diseño del cabezal de la afeitadora: Doble; Individual; Triple; Otros
de: Design des Rasierkopfs: Doppel; Einzel; Dreifach; Sonstiges
nl: Ontwerp scheermeskop: Dubbel; Single; Driedubbel; Andere
sv: Design på rakapparatshuvud: Dubbel; Enkel; Trippel; Övrigt
nb: Utforming av barberhøvelhode: Dobbel; Enkel; Trippel; Annet
ko: 면도기 헤드 디자인: 더블; 싱글; 트리플; 기타
tr: Jilet başlığı tasarımı: Çift kişilik; Tek; Üçlü; Diğer
hr-HR: Dizajn glave britve: Dvostruka; Jednostruka; Trostruka; Ostalo
zh-CN: 剃刀刀头设计: 双人; 单; 三; 其他
ro-RO: Design cap aparat de ras: Dublu; Simplu; Triplu; Altele
pl: Projekt głowicy golarki: Podwójny; Singiel; Potrójne; Inne
da: Barberhoveddesign: Dobbelt; Enkelt; Tredobbelt; Andet
zh-TW: 刮鬍刀頭設計: 雙倍; 單倍; 三倍; 其他
it: Modello della testina del rasoio: Doppio; Singolo; Tripla; Altro
th: ออกแบบหัวมีดโกน: แบบคู่; แบบเดี่ยว; แบบสามชั้น; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Dizajn glave brivnika: Dvojna; Enojna; Trojna; Drugo
hu: Borotvafej kialakítása: Dupla; Szimpla; Tripla; Egyéb
vi: Thiết kế đầu dao cạo: Gấp đôi; Đơn; Gấp ba; Khác
fi: Partakoneen pään muotoilu: Tupla; Yksittäinen; Kolminkertainen; Muu
ru: Конструкция головки бритвы: Двойной; Одинарный; Тройной; Другой
sk-SK: Dizajn hlavy holiaceho strojčeka: Dvojitý; Jeden; Trojitý; Iné
el: Σχέδιο κεφαλής ξυραφιού: Διπλό; Μονό; Τρία; Άλλο
bg-BG: Дизайн на глава на самобръсначка: Двойно; Единично; Тройно; Други
pt-BR: Formato da cabeça da lâmina: Duplo; Único; Triplo; Outro
lt-LT: Skustuvo galvutės dizainas: Dviguba; Single; Trigubas; Kita
pt-PT: Design da cabeça da lâmina: Duplo; Único; Triplo; Outro
ja: ヘッドの種類: ダブル; シングル; トリプル; その他